Utah statutes.
58-37e-11.   Standard of proof -- Effect of criminal drug conviction.
(1)  Proof of participation in the illegal drug market in an action brought
under this chapter shall be shown by clear and convincing evidence.  Except as
otherwise provided in this chapter, other elements of the cause of action
shall be shown by a preponderance of the evidence.
(2)  A person against whom recovery is sought who has a criminal conviction
pursuant to state drug laws or the Comprehensive Drug Abuse Prevention and
Control Act of 1970, Pub. L. 91-513, 84 Stat. 1236, codified at 21 U.S.C. Sec.
801 et seq., is estopped from denying participation in the illegal drug
market.  A conviction is also prima facie evidence of the person's
participation in the illegal drug market during the two years preceding the
date of an act giving rise to a conviction.
(3)  The absence of a criminal drug conviction of a person against whom
recovery is sought does not bar an action against that person.
